src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_vuonjas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vuonjâš: # Checked with Matti Morottaja & Pekka Sammallahti; double čč should be the 1st form; č at least accepted, also recommended, if possible 
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuonjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Ill: vuonjâččân
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Loc: vuonjâččist
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Com: vuonjâččáin
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuonnjâšttáá
    vuonjâš+N+Ess: vuonjâččin
    vuonjâš+N+Par: vuonjâččid
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Nom: vuonjâččeh
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Gen: vuonjâččij
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Acc: vuonjâččijd
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Ill: vuonjâččáid
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Loc: vuonjâččijn
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuonjâččijguin, vuonjâččijgijn]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Abe: vuonjâččijttáá

  Noun - kierâš: # MLO, ok 
    kierâš+N+Sg+Nom: kierâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Gen: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Acc: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Ill: kierâččân
    kierâš+N+Sg+Loc: kierâččist
    kierâš+N+Sg+Com: kierâččáin
    kierâš+N+Sg+Abe: kierrâšttáá
    kierâš+N+Ess: kierâččin
    kierâš+N+Par: kierâččid
    kierâš+N+Pl+Nom: kierâččeh
    kierâš+N+Pl+Gen: kierâččij
    kierâš+N+Pl+Acc: kierâččijd
    kierâš+N+Pl+Ill: kierâččáid
    kierâš+N+Pl+Loc: kierâččijn
    kierâš+N+Pl+Com: [kierâččijguin, kierâččijgijn]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Abe: kierâččijttáá

  Noun - vuorâš: # MLO, ok 
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuorâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Ill: vuorâččân
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Loc: vuorâččist
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Com: vuorâččáin
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuorrâšttáá
    vuorâš+N+Ess: vuorâččin
    vuorâš+N+Par: vuorâččid
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Nom: vuorâččeh
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Gen: vuorâččij
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Acc: vuorâččijd
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Ill: vuorâččáid
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Loc: vuorâččijn
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuorâččijguin, vuorâččijgijn]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Abe: vuorâččijttáá
